Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB152.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *( a.13 ) Any amount of an allowance that is provided by a church or religious organization to an individual who is duly ordained, commissioned or licensed by a religious body constituting a church or church denomination and has the authority to conduct religious worship, perform sacerdotal 12345678910111213141516171819202122 functions and administer ordinances or sacraments according to the prescribed tenets and practices of that church or denomination, for housing, regardless of whether the housing is located on property that is owned by the church or denomination, shall be excluded from income under this article.* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.13) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023. Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0152PN0112 - 2 - 123456789